Massachusetts, session 194th, H481.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 23N by replacing the last clause in the definition of
“Category 2 license” to the following:-
provided further, a category 2 licensee may, in lieu of the fee in section 5(f), make a
capital investment of not less than $7,500,000 in a sports wagering facility.
of 1